Utah statutes.
62A-1-107.5.   Limitation on establishment of advisory bodies.

(1)  Department divisions and boards:

(a)  may not establish permanent, ongoing advisory groups unless otherwise specifically created in federal or state statute; and

(b)  shall comply with the provisions of this section with regard to any advisory groups created prior to or after July 1, 2003.

(2)  Divisions and boards may establish subject-limited and time-limited ad hoc advisory groups to provide input necessary to carry out their assigned responsibilities.  When establishing such an advisory group, the board must establish in writing a specific charge and time limit.

(3)  Members of any ad hoc advisory group shall receive no compensation or benefits for their service.

(4)  The provision of staffing and support to any ad hoc advisory group will be contingent on availability of human and financial resources.

